Massachusetts, session 194th, H3952.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the contrary,
including any general law that has been duly adopted by the District Meeting of Dartmouth Fire
District No. 1, the Treasurer of the District shall be appointed by the Prudential Committee of the
District for a term up to but not more than three years; provided, that the Treasurer may be
reappointed for another such term as the Prudential Committee, in its discretion, desires; further
provided, that any such reappointment may only occur in the last year of the Treasurer's current
term. The Treasurer shall receive such salary as may be determined through the execution of a
contract with the Prudential Committee for the term of the appointment, subject to appropriation
by the District Meeting. The Prudential Committee may suspend, terminate or otherwise
discipline the Treasurers pursuant to the terms set forth in the employment contract.
Section 2. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
of 1